Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5396.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-72-5.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-72 entitled "Department
of Children, Youth and Families" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-72-5.3. Accreditation.
(a)(1) The standards set by the Council on Accreditation (COA) are nationally recognized
as best practices for protecting and providing services to abused and neglected children;
(2) Achieving and maintaining these standards requires a solid commitment from the
legislative, executive, and judicial branches of government;
(3) It is the intent of the general assembly to provide the resources for the department of
children, youth and families to meet, achieve, and sustain accreditation by the Council on
Accreditation.
(b) The department of children, youth and families (the "department") shall initiate the
process for seeking COA accreditation no later than September 1, 2019, and shall submit an
accreditation plan to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the
senate, the chairperson of the house committee on health, education and welfare, the chairperson
of the senate committee on health and human services, the chairpersons of the finance committees
of the house and senate, and to the chairpersons of the judiciary committees of the house and senate
no later than October 1, 2020. Said plan shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(1) Inputs, including updated staffing requirements, a timetable for achieving those

requirements, and any additional costs associated with achieving accreditation;
(2) Outcomes, including an assessment based on statistical and other evidence, of the
impact of accreditation on the number of abused and neglected children, the nature of their abuse,
and the relationships between such children and their families.
(c) Caseloads for department workers.
(1) Regardless of the status of COA accreditation, the department shall apply general
caseload limits for department workers in a manner similar to those contained in COA caseload
standards for public agencies. More specifically, caseloads for workers shall support the
achievement of child and family outcomes, shall be regularly reviewed, and generally shall not
exceed the following:
(i) Twelve (12) active investigations at a time, including no more than eight (8) new
investigations per month;
(ii) Fourteen (14) families receiving ongoing in-home services;
(iii) Twelve (12) children in out-of-home care, and their families; and
(iv) Eight (8) children in treatment foster care, and their families.
(2) By “generally,” it is understood that there may be circumstances under which caseloads
may exceed these limits, such as when the department is faced with temporary staff vacancies or
when administrative case functions are assigned to other personnel; however, the department shall
make all efforts to meet the caseload numbers set forth in this subsection.
(d) The department shall conduct a pay rate review annually for current employees, to
ensure the department is competitive with its compensation to employees. The department shall
conduct an analysis of New England states' salaries for similar employees, and shall compensate
current employees based on the data collected. The director is hereby authorized to promulgate
rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001191
========
LC001191 - Page 2 of 3